Illinois, session 104th, HB2864.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Use Tax Act is amended by changing Section 52c as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 105/2c)  (from Ch. 120, par. 439.2c)7    Sec. 2c. For purposes of this Act, a corporation, limited 8liability company, society, association, foundation, or 9institution organized and operated exclusively for educational 10purposes shall include: all tax-supported public schools; 11private schools which offer systematic instruction in useful 12branches of learning by methods common to public schools and 13which compare favorably in their scope and intensity with the 14course of study presented in tax-supported schools; nonprofit 15corporations that solely conduct extracurricular activities on 16behalf of tax-supported public schools; licensed day care 17centers as defined in Section 2.09 of the Child Care Act of 181969 which are operated by a not for profit corporation, 19society, association, foundation, institution or organization; 20vocational or technical schools or institutes organized and 21operated exclusively to provide a course of study of not less 22than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare individuals to 23follow a trade or to pursue a manual, technical, mechanical,   HB2864- 2 -LRB104 10619 HLH 20695 b1industrial, business or commercial occupation.2    However, a corporation, limited liability company, 3society, association, foundation or institution organized and 4operated for the purpose of offering professional, trade or 5business seminars of short duration, self-improvement or 6personality development courses, courses which are avocational 7or recreational in nature, courses pursued entirely by open 8circuit television or radio, correspondence courses, or 9courses which do not provide specialized training within a 10specific vocational or technical field shall not be considered 11to be organized and operated exclusively for educational 12purposes.13(Source: P.A. 88-480.) 14    Section 10. The Retailers' Occupation Tax Act is amended 15by changing Section 2h as follows: 16    (35 ILCS 120/2h)  (from Ch. 120, par. 441h)17    Sec. 2h. For purposes of this Act, a corporation, limited 18liability company, society, association, foundation, or 19institution organized and operated exclusively for educational 20purposes shall include: all tax-supported public schools; 21private schools which offer systematic instruction in useful 22branches of learning by methods common to public schools and 23which compare favorably in their scope and intensity with the 24course of study presented in tax-supported schools; nonprofit   HB2864- 3 -LRB104 10619 HLH 20695 b1corporations that solely conduct extracurricular activities on 2behalf of tax-supported public schools; licensed day care 3centers as defined in Section 2.09 of the Child Care Act of 41969 which are operated by a not for profit corporation, 5society, association, foundation, institution or organization; 6vocational or technical schools or institutes organized and 7operated exclusively to provide a course of study of not less 8than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare individuals to 9follow a trade or to pursue a manual, technical, mechanical, 10industrial, business or commercial occupation.11    However, a corporation, limited liability company, 12society, association, foundation or institution organized and 13operated for the purpose of offering professional, trade or 14business seminars of short duration, self-improvement or 15personality development courses, courses which are avocational 16or recreational in nature, courses pursued entirely by open 17circuit television or radio, correspondence courses, or 18courses which do not provide specialized training within a 19specific vocational or technical field shall not be considered 20to be organized and operated exclusively for educational 21purposes.22(Source: P.A. 88-480.)